Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-114
Gender and number, how construed.

The words used in the singular shall include the plural; and in the masculine gender shall include the feminine and neuter genders, and vice versa, as the case may require.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 11, p. 390;

R.S.1913, § 6299;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. I, § 12, p. 546;

C.S.1922, § 5819;

C.S.1929, § 77-112;

R.S.1943, § 77-114.

For statute construction, see section 49-802.

Singular number often includes the plural in construction of statutes, generally when manifest intention of Legislature requires it. Follmer v. State, 94 Neb. 217, 142 N.W. 908 (1913).